District of Columbia statutes.
31-5607.03

Public information; confidentiality.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, information and documents filed with, or obtained by, the Commissioner shall be available for public examination under subchapter II of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

The following information and documents shall not constitute public information under subsection (a) of this section:

(1)

Information or documents obtained by the Commissioner in connection with an investigation under § 31-5606.01; and

(2)

Information or documents filed with the Commissioner in connection with a registration statement under subchapter III of this chapter or a report under § 31-5602.04 constituting trade secrets or commercial or financial information of a person for which a person is entitled to a claim of confidentiality or privilege.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 703, 47 DCR 7837